vi: Bao gồm đồ nướng: Bánh mì tròn; Bánh quy; Ổ bánh mì; Bánh hạnh nhân; Bánh ngọt; Bánh sừng bò; Bánh nướng nhỏ; Bánh ngọt Đan Mạch; Bánh vòng; Bánh nướng xốp kiểu Anh; Bánh trái cây; Bánh nướng xốp; Bánh cuộn; Bộ bốn bánh nhỏ; Bánh nướng; Bánh ngọt cuộn; Bánh tart; Éclair; Khác
bg-BG: Включени хлебни произведения: Франзела; Бисквита; Питка хляб; Брауни; Торта; Кроасан; Кексче; Датски сладкиш; Поничка; Английски мъфин; Плодов пай; Мъфин; Сладкарско руло; Petit four; Скоун; Сладко руло; Тарт; Еклер; Други
sl-SI: Priloženi pekovski izdelki: Bagel; Piškoti; Hleb kruha; Rjavček; Torta; Rogljiček; Kolaček; Dansko pecivo; Krof; Angleški mafin; Sadna pita; Mafin; Zavitek; Petit four; Čajni kolač; Sladki zavitek; Tortica; Éclair; Drugo
lt-LT: Komplekte esantys kepiniai: Beigelis; Sausainis; Duonos kepalas; Šokoladainis; Tortas; Kruasanas; Keksiukas; Daniškas pyragaitis; Spurga; Angliškas keksiukas; Vaisių pyragas; Mafinas; Sviestinės tešlos suktinukas; Vieno kąsnio desertai; Paplotėlis; Saldus sukutis; Tartaletė; Ekleras; Kita
hu: A tartalmazott pékáruk: Bagel; Teasütemény; Kenyér; Brownie; Torta; Croissant; Cupcake; Dán sütemény; Fánk; Angol muffin; Gyümölcsös pite; Muffin; Tésztatekercs; Petit four; Pogácsa; Édes rolád; Gyümölcslepény; Éclair; Egyéb
pt-BR: Itens de padaria incluídos: Bagel; Biscoito; Pão; Brownie; Bolo; Croissant; Bolinho; Folhados; Rosquinha; muffin inglês; Torta de frutas; Muffin; Rolo de amassar; Petit four; Scone; Pão doce; Torta; Bomba; Outro
sk-SK: Pekárenské výrobky v cene: Bágel; Sušienka; Bochník chleba; Brownie; Koláč; Croissant; Cupcake; Dánske sladké pečivo; Šiška; Anglický muffin; Ovocný koláč; Mafin; Rolka; Petit four; Koláčik; Sladká roláda; Tortička; Éclair; Iné
hr-HR: Uključeni pekarski proizvodi: Bagel pecivo; Keks; Štruca kruha; Brownie; Torta; Kroasan; Cupcake kolačić; Dansko pecivo; Krafna; Engleski muffin; Voćna pita; Muffin; Rolada od tijesta; Petit four; Pecivo scone; Slatka rolada; Tart; Ekler; Ostalo
ko: 베이커리 품목 포함: 베이글; 비스킷; 빵 덩어리; 브라우니; 케이크; 크로와상; 컵케이크; 데니쉬 페이스트리; 도넛; 잉글리시 머핀; 과일 파이; 머핀; 페이스트리 롤; 쁘띠 푸르; 스콘; 스위트 롤; 타르트; 에클레어; 기타
nl: Bakkerijproducten inbegrepen: Bagel; Biscuit; Brood; Brownie; Cake; Croissant; Cupcake; Deense gebakjes; Donut; Engelse muffin; Vruchtentaart; Muffin; Gebakjes; Petitfours; Scone; Zoete broodjes; Tart tatin; Éclair; Andere
it: Articoli da forno inclusi: Bagel; Biscotto; Pagnotta di pane; Brownie; Tavoletta; Croissant; Cupcake; Dolci danesi; Ciambella; Muffin inglesi; Torte di frutta; Muffin; Rotolino dolce; Piccola pasticceria; Focaccina; Rotolo dolce; Crostata; Éclair; Altro
de: Backwaren inklusive: Bagel; Keks; Brotlaib; Brownie; Kuchen; Croissant; Cupcake; Gebäck; Donut; Englischer Muffin; Früchtekuchen; Muffin; Teigrolle; Feingebäck; Scone; Süßes Brötchen; Torte; Éclair; Sonstiges
sv: Bageriartiklar som ingår: Bagel; Kex; Brödlimpa; Brownie; Kaka; Croissant; Cupcake; Wienerbröd; Munk; Engelska muffins; Fruktpaj; Muffin; Konditorivaror; Petit fours; Scone; Söta bullar; Tart; Éclair; Annat
en: Bakery items included: Bagel; Biscuit; Bread loaf; Brownie; Cake; Croissant; Cupcake; Danish pastry; Donut; English muffin; Fruit pie; Muffin; Pastry roll; Petit four; Scone; Sweet roll; Tart; Éclair; Other
ro-RO: Produse de panificație incluse: Covrig; Biscuit; Franzelă; Negresă; Tort; Croasant; Brioșă cu glazură; Daneze; Gogoașă; Brioșă englezească; Plăcintă cu fructe; Brioșă; Ruladă de patiserie; Petit four; Brioșe englezești; Melci; Tartă; Ecler; Altele
zh-TW: 包括烘焙品項: 貝果; 餅乾; 整條麵包; 布朗尼; 蛋糕; 可頌; 杯子蛋糕; 丹麥麵包; 甜甜圈; 英式馬芬; 水果派; 馬芬; 糕點捲; 花色小蛋糕; 司康; 甜麵包捲; 塔; 閃電泡芙; 其他
fi: Mukana leipomotuotteet: Bagel; Keksi; Vuokaleivät; Brownie; Kakku; Croissant; Kuppikakku; Viinerit; Donitsi; Englantilaiset muffinit; Hedelmäpiirakat; Muffinssi; Taikinarullat; Petit four; Teeleipä; Korvapuusti; Torttu; Tuulihattu; Muu
pt-PT: Itens de padaria incluídos: Bagel; Biscoito; Pão de forma; Brownie; Bolo; Croissant; Cupcake; Doces dinamarqueses; Donut; Muffin ingleses; Tarte de fruta; Muffin; Tortas de pastelaria; Petit four; Scone; Pães doces; Tarte; Éclair; Outro
el: Περιλαμβάνονται είδη αρτοποιίας: Κουλούρι; Μπισκότο; Καρβέλι ψωμιού; Μπράουνι; Κέικ; Κρουασάν; Κεκάκι; Γλυκά σφολιάτας; Λουκουμάς; Αγγλικό μάφιν; Τάρτα φρούτων; Μάφιν; Ρολό ζύμης; Πτι φουρ; Ψωμάκι; Γλυκό ψωμάκι; Τάρτα; Εκλέρ; Άλλο
th: รวมอุปกรณ์เบเกอรี่: เบเกิล; บิสกิต; ขนมปังแถว; บราวนี่; เค้ก; ครัวซองต์; คัพเค้ก; ขนมอบเดนมาร์ก; รสโดนัท; อิงลิชมัฟฟิน; พายผลไม้; มัฟฟิน; ขนมโรล; ขนมขนาดพอดีคำ; สโคน; ขนมปังหวาน; ทาร์ต; เอแคลร์; อื่นๆ
da: Bageartikler medfølger: Bagel; Kiks; Brød; Brownie; Kage; Croissant; Cupcake; Wienerbrød; Donut; Engelsk muffin; Frugttærte; Muffin; Konditorrulle; Petit four; Scone; Slikrulle; Tart; Éclair; Andet
nb: Bakeartikler medfølger: Bagel; Kjeks; Brødloff; Brownie; Kake; Croissant; Cupcake; Dansk bakverk; Smultring; Engelske muffins; Fruktpai; Muffins; Bakverkrull; Småkake; Scone; Søtt rundstykke; Tart; Éclair; Annen
pl: Artykuły piekarnicze w zestawie: Bajgiel; Herbatnik; Bochenek chleba; Brownie; Placek; Croissant; Babeczka; Ciasto duńskie; Pączek; Babeczka angielska; Placek owocowy; Muffin; Bułka; Ciastko petit four; Babeczka z masłem; Słodka bułka; Tarta; Ekler; Pozostałe
ru: Состав набора выпечки: Бублик; Печенье; Буханка хлеба; Брауни; Пирожное; Круассан; Кекс; Датская сдоба; Пончик; Английский маффин; Фруктовый пирог; Маффин; Рулет из теста; Птифур; Скон; Сладкий рулет; Пирог; Эклер; Другое
zh-CN: 包含烘焙食品: 百吉饼; 饼干; 长条面包; 布朗尼; 蛋糕; 羊角面包; 纸杯蛋糕; 丹麦包; 甜甜圈; 英式松饼; 水果馅饼; 小松糕; 糕点卷; 小蛋糕; 司康饼; 甜面包; 蛋挞; 闪电泡芙; 其他
fr: Produits de boulangerie inclus: Bagel; Biscuit; Miche de pain; Brownie; Gâteau; Croissant; Cupcake; Viennoiseries; Donut; Muffin anglais; Tarte aux fruits; Muffin; Rouleau de pâtisserie; Petit four; Scone; Petit pain sucré; Tarte; Éclair; Autre
ja: ベーカリーアイテム付き: ベーグル; ビスケット; 食パン; ブラウニー; ケーキ; クロワッサン; カップケーキ; デニッシュペストリー; ドーナツ; イングリッシュマフィン; フルーツパイ; マフィン; ペストリーロール; プティフール; スコーン; スイートロール; タルト; エクレア; その他
tr: Fırın ürünleri dahil: Simit; Bisküvi; Somun ekmek; Brownie; Kek; Kruvasan; Cupcake; Danimarka pastaları; Donut; İngiliz muffin; Meyveli turtalar; Muffin; Pasta ruloları; Küçük pastalar; İngiliz çöreği; Tatlı çörek; turta; Ekler; Diğer
cs: Obsažené pečicí předměty: Bagel; Sušenka; Bochník chleba; Brownie; Dort; Croissant; Košíček; Dánské pečivo; Kobliha; Anglický muffin; Ovocný koláč; Muffin; Cukrářská rolka; Petitky; Buchtička; Sladká Rolka; Dortík; Éclair; Jiné
es: Artículos de panadería incluidos: Bagel; Galleta; Hogaza de pan; Bizcocho de chocolate; Pastel; Cruasán; Magdalena; Bollería danesa; Dónut; Magdalena inglesa; Tarta de frutas; Magdalena; Rollo de repostería; Petit four; Bollito; Panecillo dulce; Tarta; Petisú; Otros